Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1007
Act, how cited.

Sections 52-1001 to 52-1008 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act.

Laws 1969, c. 433, § 7, p. 1459;

Laws 1988, LB 933, § 8.